Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-302.02
Parent or person standing in loco parentis; exemption.

Section 48-302 shall not apply to a parent or a person standing in loco parentis who employs and directly supervises his or her own child or a child in his or her custody in a business owned and operated by such parent or person standing in loco parentis. This section shall not exempt such an employer from the restrictions on hours of work, work, or place of performance described in sections 48-310 and 48-313.

Laws 1993, LB 162, § 1.